Nevada, session 83, AB461.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-59 and 59.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 60. Chapter 427A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department, through the Division, shall conduct a
program to:
(a) Develop and carry out a public awareness campaign to
provide information to the public about the importance of
planning for long-term care that provides information relevant to
the changing demographics of this State. A public awareness
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
campaign carried out pursuant to this paragraph must engage
with various forms of media, including, without limitation,
television and digital platforms, to ensure the campaign reaches a
wide audience throughout this State.
(b) Create and maintain on the Internet website of the Division
comprehensive information on the resources and tools available to
residents of this State to assist residents of this State with planning
for long-term care.
(c) Coordinate with financial planners, providers of health
care, insurance companies and community organizations to
provide throughout this State workshops, seminars and
educational sessions that provide information on planning for
long-term care.
(d) Prepare planning guides, brochures and other printed
material and make such material available to the public,
community centers and other relevant organizations that may
distribute such materials to residents of this State. The materials
prepared and made available pursuant to this paragraph must
incorporate a range of educational material, including electronic
and physical materials, that offer detailed information about
options for long-term care, tools for planning for long-term care
and financial assistance with long-term care that is available to
residents of this State.
2. In carrying out the provisions of subsection 1, the
Department, through the Division, shall:
(a) Incorporate best practices from other states and engage a
diverse range of stakeholders, including, without limitation,
financial planners, providers of health care, insurance companies,
senior advocacy groups, nonprofit and grassroots organizations,
and local government agencies that work with the elderly
population in this State, with an emphasis on engaging with
organizations with significant connections to the elderly
population in this State and have a thorough understanding of the
unique needs and challenges experienced by different segments of
the elderly population in this State.
(b) Address specific demographic segments within the elderly
population in this State, including, without limitation, persons
who are not proficient in the English language, veterans and
residents of rural communities, to ensure the inclusivity and
accessibility of resources.
3. The Department, through the Division, may implement the
provisions of subsection 1 in phases, with initial priority given to
areas of this State with a high concentration of elderly persons
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
and person with limited access to long-term planning resources.
The Department may select counties in this State to host pilot
programs to test and refine outreach and delivery strategies for
implementation statewide.
4. The Department, through the Division, shall develop a
framework to monitor, evaluate and assess the effectiveness of the
program set forth in subsection 1, and to adapt the program as
necessary. In monitoring, evaluating, assessing and adapting the
program, the Department, through the Division, shall gather input
from participants and stakeholders, including, without limitation,
nonprofit and grassroots organizations.
5. On or before February 1 of each year, the Administrator
shall submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal:
(a) In even-numbered years, to the Legislative Commission
and the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services; and
(b) In odd-numbered years, to the next regular session of the
Legislature.
6. The Division may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Secs. 61-65, 65.5, 66-68, 68.3, 68.5, 68.7, 69, 69.5, 70, 70.3,
70.5, 70.7, 71-73, 73.3, 73.5, 73.7, 74, 74.3, 74.7, 75, 75.5 and 76-
80. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 80.5. The Legislature hereby respectfully requests that the
Guardianship Commission created by the Nevada Supreme Court:
1. In the normal course of business of the Commission,
examine:
(a) The provisions of the Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act
that have not been enacted in this State;
(b) The manner in which the Uniform Health-Care Decisions
Act has been implemented in other jurisdictions; and
(c) The effects of such implementation in other jurisdictions;
and
2. Provide recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services, in writing or at a
meeting of the Committee, concerning:
(a) Whether any or all of the provisions of the Uniform Health-
Care Decisions Act which have not yet been enacted in this State
should be enacted;
(b) If the Commission recommends the enactment of any
additional provisions of the Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act in
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
this State, any modifications to those provisions that the
Commission deems advisable;
(c) The potential benefits and drawbacks of enacting any or all
of the provisions of the Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act in this
State; and
(d) Any other subjects related to the Uniform Health-Care
Decisions Act, as the Commission deems advisable.
Sec. 81. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 82. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 83. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)